lt-LT: Apatinio žandikaulio prietaiso pritaikymo metodas: Virinti ir kandžioti; Individualus laboratorijoje pagamintas; Momentinis pritaikymas; Pusiau individualus; Kita
pt-BR: Método de adaptação do dispositivo mandibular: Ferve e morde; Feito em laboratório personalizado; Ajuste instantâneo; Semipersonalizado; Outro
da: Tilpasningsmetode for mandibulær enhed: Kog-og-bid; Specialfremstillet på laboratorium; Øjeblikkelig tilpasning; Semi-specialfremstillet; Andet
zh-TW: 下顎裝置配合方法: 煮沸咬合式; 實驗室客製; 即時配戴; 半客製; 其他
ru: Метод подгонки нижнечелюстного устройства: Кипяти и кусай; Изготовленный в лаборатории на заказ; Мгновенная подгонка; Полу-индивидуальный; Другой
th: วิธีการติดตั้งอุปกรณ์ขากรรไกรล่าง: ต้มและกัด; ทำพิเศษจากแล็บ; ใส่ได้ทันที; กึ่งสั่งทำ; อื่นๆ
tr: Çene cihazı yerleştirme yöntemi: Kaynat ve ısır; Özel laboratuvar üretimi; Anında uyum; Yarı özel; Diğer
sv: Käkskenas anpassningsmetod: Koka och bita; Specialtillverkad i laboratorium; Omedelbar passform; Halvanpassad; Övrigt
bg-BG: Метод на напасване на мандибуларната шина: Сварете и захапете; Персонализирано лабораторно; Моментално прилягане; Полу-персонализирано; Други
ja: 顎デバイスフィッティング方法: ボイル＆バイト; カスタムラボ製; インスタントフィット; セミカスタム; その他
el: Μέθοδος εφαρμογής γναθικής συσκευής: Βράσιμο και δάγκωμα; Προσαρμοσμένο εργαστηριακό; Άμεση εφαρμογή; Ημι-προσαρμοσμένο; Άλλο
es: Método de ajuste del dispositivo mandibular: Hervir y morder; Hecho a medida en laboratorio; Ajuste instantáneo; Semipersonalizado; Otros
zh-CN: 下颌装置适配方法: 热塑成型; 定制实验室制作; 即时适配; 半定制; 其他
pt-PT: Método de ajuste do dispositivo mandibular: Fervura e moldagem; Personalizado em laboratório; Ajuste instantâneo; Semi-personalizado; Outro
de: Anpassungsmethode des Unterkiefergeräts: Kochen und beißen; Laboranfertigung; Sofortpassform; Halbindividuell; Sonstiges
nb: Tilpasningsmetode for kjeveenhet: Kok og bit; Spesialtilpasset laboratorielaget; Øyeblikkelig tilpasning; Halvtilpasset; Annet
nl: Kaakbeugel aanpasmethode: Kook-en-bijt; Op maat gemaakt in laboratorium; Direct passend; Semi-maatwerk; Andere
ro-RO: Metoda de ajustare a dispozitivului mandibular: Fierbere și modelare; Personalizat în laborator; Potrivire instantă; Semi-personalizat; Altele
pl: Metoda dopasowania aparatu żuchwowego: Zagotuj i ugryź; Wykonany na zamówienie w laboratorium; Natychmiastowe dopasowanie; Półindywidualny; Inne
it: Metodo di adattamento del dispositivo mandibolare: Bollire e mordere; Personalizzato in laboratorio; Adattamento istantaneo; Semi-personalizzato; Altro
sl-SI: Način prilagajanja čeljustne naprave: Kuhanje in grizenje; Laboratorijsko izdelan po meri; Takojšnje prileganje; Delno po meri; Drugo
fr: Méthode d’ajustement du dispositif mandibulaire: Thermoformable; Sur mesure en laboratoire; Ajustement instantané; Semi-personnalisé; Autre
hu: Állkapocseszköz illesztési módszere: Forrázható-harapható; Egyedi laboratóriumi gyártású; Azonnali illeszkedés; Félig egyedi; Egyéb
fi: Leukalaitteen sovitusmenetelmä: Keitä ja pure; Laboratoriossa räätälöity; Välitön sovitus; Puoliräätälöity; Muu
sk-SK: Metóda nasadenia čeľustnej pomôcky: Uvar a zahryź; Na mieru vyrobené v laboratóriu; Okamžité prispôsobenie; Čiastočne na mieru; Iné
ko: 하악 장치 맞춤 방법: 보일 앤 바이트; 맞춤 제작; 즉시 착용; 세미 맞춤; 기타
en: Mandibular device fitting method: Boil-and-bite; Custom lab-made; Instant fit; Semi-custom; Other
vi: Phương pháp lắp thiết bị hàm dưới: Luộc và cắn; Làm riêng tại phòng thí nghiệm; Vừa ngay; Bán tùy chỉnh; Khác
cs: Způsob přizpůsobení mandibulárního zařízení: Uvaření a přizpůsobení; Laboratorně vyrobené na míru; Okamžité přizpůsobení; Částečně na míru; Jiné
hr-HR: Metoda prilagođavanja mandibularnog uređaja: Kuhanje i grizenje; Prilagođeno laboratorijski izrađeno; Instant prilagodba; Polu-prilagođeno; Ostalo